Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.020

Sessions—Judges may act as magistrates—Night court.

The municipal court shall be always open except on nonjudicial days. It shall hold regular and special sessions at such times as may be prescribed by the judges thereof. The judges shall have the power to act as magistrates in accordance with the provisions of chapter 10.16 RCW. The legislative body of the city may by ordinance authorize a department of the municipal court to act as a night court, and shall appropriate the necessary funds therefor.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.20.020. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 2.]